Utah statutes.
17-37-9.   Donations permitted -- Use.

If a person desires to make donations of money, personal property, or real estate specifically for the benefit of a county planetarium, the board of directors may, with the consent of the county legislative body, accept those donations or other contributions. The board of directors shall manage and administer the donations or contributions in accordance with the terms and conditions of the donating or contributing instrument. All real property and improvements acquired by or specifically for a county planetarium by any means whatsoever, including gift, devise or donation, shall be deeded to and held in the name of the county.



Amended by Chapter 227, 1993 General Session

